test/src/morphology/N-kask8_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kask: # Noun (8) kask 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kask+N+Sg+Nom: kask
     kask+N+Sg+Gen: kaska
     kask+N+Sg+Par: kaskat
     kask+N+Sg+Ill: kaskahe
     kask+N+Pl+Gen: kaskidõ
     kask+N+Pl+Par: kaskit
     kask+N+Pl+Ill: kaskihe
     kask+N+Pl+All: kaskilõ
